California, session 20252026, AB972.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66270 of the Education Code is amended to read:66270. A person shall not be subjected to discrimination on the basis of disability, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 or subdivision (r) of Section 12926 of the Government Code Code, or any other characteristic that is contained in the prohibition of hate crimes set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 422.6 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, in a program or activity conducted by a postsecondary educational institution that receives, or benefits from, state financial assistance or enrolls students who receive state student financial aid.